Washington statutes.
RCW 4.84.100

Costs on postponement of trial.

When an application shall be made to a court or referees to postpone a trial, the payment to the adverse party of a sum not exceeding ten dollars, besides the fees of witnesses, may be imposed as the condition of granting the postponement.

[Code 1881 s 515; 1877 p 109 s 519; 1854 p 203 s 377; RRS s 484.]